Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2805
Division of corrections; established; administrative officer; qualifications.

To aid the county board of corrections in accomplishing the purposes of sections 23-1723 and 23-2801 to 23-2806, there is hereby established the division of corrections under the jurisdiction of the board. The administrative officer of the division shall be the director of corrections, who shall be qualified by education, training, and experience to perform the duties of such position.

Laws 1974, LB 782, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 396, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 5.